Hawaii statutes.
§454F-1.5 Registration with NMLS required.
(a) All mortgage loan originators, mortgage loan originator companies,
exempt registered mortgage loan originators, exempt sponsoring mortgage loan
originator companies, nonprofit organizations, and every other person in this
State that originates a residential mortgage loan, unless exempt under section
454F-2, shall register with NMLS.

(b) Exempt registered mortgage loan
originators, unless exempt under section 454F-2, shall register and maintain a
unique identifier through NMLS, but shall not be required to be licensed under
this chapter. [L 2010, c 84, pt of §3; am L 2011, c 194, §3; am L 2012, c 252,
§3; am L 2013, c 168, §3; am L 2016, c 122, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next